Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1804.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 38, chapter 8, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 38-1121, to read: START_STATUTE38-1121. Law enforcement officers; cameras; data storage; applicability A. Notwithstanding any other law, All camera footage that is captured by a law ENFORCEMENT officer's body-worn camera or dash camera must be deleted thirty days after the camera footage was first recorded. B. This section does not apply to any camera footage that is involved in or necessary for any of the following: 1. active criminal cases. 2. Potential civil liability. 3. Active criminal prosecutions. END_STATUTE